Massachusetts, session 194th, H4075.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 26. (a) For the purpose of this section, the following terms shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Certified infant CPR responder”, any individual who has been formally trained and
certified in administering CPR specifically for infants by a recognized certifying body, including
but not limited to, the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.
Dispatching authority”, any agency or organization responsible for dispatching
emergency first responders, including 911 operators.
“Infant”, a child aged 12 months or younger.
of 4

“Intervention”, any attempt to provide medical or physical care to an infant experiencing
a life-threatening emergency.
(b)(1) The dispatching authority, upon receiving a call reporting an infant in respiratory
distress, choking or otherwise requiring immediate CPR, shall prioritize the dispatch of 1 or
more certified infant CPR responders to the scene. The dispatching authority shall notify all
emergency personnel that the individual in need of immediate CPR is an infant.
(2) The dispatching authority shall maintain a registry of certified responders and ensure
the availability of such responders for infant-related emergencies at all times.
(3) Emergency responders not certified in infant CPR may assist in other logistical
capacities but shall not perform CPR on the infant unless directed by a certified responder due to
exigent circumstances.
(4) The executive office of public safety shall create an infant CPR responder checklist
that requires dispatchers and all emergency personnel to certify and confirm that a certified
responder has been dispatched and that all responders are aware the individual in need of
emergency medical services is an infant.
(c)(1) At the scene of an emergency involving an infant requiring CPR: (i) only certified
infant CPR responders shall directly handle the care of the infant unless no certified responder is
present or exigent circumstances exist; and (ii) non-certified individuals, including bystanders
and other emergency personnel, shall be prohibited from intervening while a certified infant CPR
responder is actively administering care, unless explicitly instructed by the responder.
of 4

(2) Any individual not certified in infant CPR who intervenes in the care of an infant
during a life-threatening emergency shall be liable for any injury, harm or death that results from
their intervention, except when acting under explicit direction from a certified infant CPR
responder. Any individual who intervenes in violation of this paragraph shall be subject to civil
liability for harm caused by their actions.
(d) Certified infant CPR responders acting within the scope of their certification and
training shall be afforded legal protections under Massachusetts good samaritan laws pursuant to.
chapter 258C.
(e)(1) The department shall oversee public awareness campaigns to educate
Massachusetts residents on the importance of certified CPR training, specifically for infant
emergencies.
(2) All first responder agencies shall be required to maintain adequate staffing of
personnel certified in infant CPR and provide training opportunities for existing personnel to
obtain certification.
(3) All first responders, including EMTs, police officers and firefighters, shall be certified
in CPR for infants as part of their training requirements pursuant to section 201 of chapter 111.
Agencies shall ensure compliance with these standards and provide annual refresher courses.
(f) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to ensure compliance with this
section, including the development of training protocols for emergency dispatchers to
appropriately identify and prioritize infant CPR emergencies.
of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 180 days after passage to allow for the
implementation of necessary training and dispatching protocols.
of 4